nl: Kenmerken gitaarband: Ingebouwde straplocks; Elastisch/rekbaar gedeelte; Geïntegreerde kabelbinder; Antislip-achterkant; Gepersonaliseerd/naamplaatgedeelte; Plectrumhouder; Plectrumzakje; Quick-release; Reflecterend; Schouderkussentje; Overig
cs: Vlastnosti kytarového popruhu: Integrované zámky na popruh; Elastická/pružná část; Integrovaná páska na kabel; Protiskluzová zadní strana; Oblast pro jmenovku/personalizaci; Držák na trsátka; Kapsička na trsátka; Rychloupínání; Reflexní; Ramenní podložka; Ostatní
tr: Gitar askısı özellikleri: Dahili askı kilitleri; Elastik/esnek bölüm; Entegre kablo bağı; Kaymaz arka yüzey; Kişiselleştirilmiş/isim etiketi alanı; Pena tutucu; Pena cebi; Hızlı açılan; Reflektif; Omuz pedi; Diğer
ko: 기타 스트랩 기능: 내장형 스트랩 락; 탄성/스트레치 섹션; 통합 케이블 타이; 미끄럼 방지 후면; 맞춤형/이름표 공간; 피크 홀더; 피크 포켓; 퀵 릴리스; 반사 소재; 어깨 패드; 기타
lt-LT: Gitarų diržo ypatybės: Integruoti diržo užraktai; Elastinė / tampri dalis; Integruotas laido laikiklis; Neslystanti apatinė pusė; Personalizuojama / vardo kortelės vieta; Brauktukų laikiklis; Kišenėlė brauktukui; Greito atleidimo; Šviesą atspindintis; Pečių pagalvėlė; Kita
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ιμάντα κιθάρας: Ενσωματωμένες ασφάλειες ζώνης; Ελαστικό/τεντωτό τμήμα; Ενσωματωμένο δέσιμο καλωδίου; Αντιολισθητική επένδυση; Χώρος εξατομίκευσης/ετικέτας ονόματος; Θήκη για πένες; Τσεπάκι για πένες; Γρήγορη απελευθέρωση; Ανακλαστικό; Μαξιλαράκι ώμου; Άλλο
pt-BR: Funcionalidades da correia da guitarra: Travas de correia integradas; Seção elástica/flexível; Abraçadeira de cabo integrada; Forro antiderrapante; Área personalizada/para etiqueta de nome; Porta-palheta; Bolso para palheta; Liberação rápida; Refletivo; Almofada de ombro; Outro
vi: Các tính năng của dây đeo đàn guitar: Khóa dây đeo tích hợp; Phần co giãn/đàn hồi; Dây thít cáp tích hợp; Mặt sau chống trượt; Khu vực cá nhân hóa/thẻ tên; Khay để móng gảy; Túi để móng gảy; Tháo nhanh; Phản quang; Đệm vai; Khác
th: คุณสมบัติของสายสะพายกีตาร์: ตัวล็อกสายสะพายในตัว; ส่วนยางยืด/ยืดหยุ่น; ที่รัดสายเคเบิลในตัว; แผ่นรองกันลื่น; พื้นที่สำหรับปรับแต่ง/ป้ายชื่อ; ที่เก็บปิ๊ก; ช่องเก็บปิ๊ก; แบบปลดเร็ว; สะท้อนแสง; แผ่นรองบ่า; อื่นๆ
nb: Funksjoner i gitarstropp: Innebygde stroppelåser; Elastisk / strekkbart parti; Integrert kabelfeste; Sklisikker bakside; Personlig / navnelapp-område; Plekterholder; Plekterlomme; Hurtigutløser; Reflekterende; Skulderpute; Annet
fr: Caractéristiques de la sangle de guitare: Fixations pour sangle intégrées; Section élastique/extensible; Attache-câble intégré; Dos antidérapant; Zone personnalisée/porte-nom; Porte-médiators; Pochette pour médiators; Dégagement rapide; Réfléchissant; Épaulière; Autre
es: Características de la cuerda para guitarra: Bloqueos de correa integrados; Sección elástica/estirable; Sujetacables integrado; Reverso antideslizante; Área personalizada/para etiqueta de nombre; Soporte para púas; Bolsillo para púas; Liberación rápida; Reflectante; Almohadilla para hombro; Otro
it: Caratteristiche della tracolla per chitarra: Blocca tracolla integrati; Sezione elastica/estensibile; Fascetta fermacavo integrata; Retro antiscivolo; Area personalizzata/targhetta del nome; Porta plettri; Tasca per plettri; A sgancio rapido; Riflettente; Spallaccio; Altro
zh-TW: 吉他背帶功能: 內建背帶鎖; 彈性/伸縮部分; 整合式理線束帶; 防滑背襯; 個人化/名牌區; 彈片夾; 彈片口袋; 快拆; 反光; 肩墊; 其他
sk-SK: Vlastnosti gitarového popruhu: Zabudované zámky na popruh; Elastická/pružná časť; Integrovaná sťahovacia páska na kábel; Protišmyková zadná strana; Priestor na prispôsobenie/menovku; Držiak na trsátka; Vrecko na trsátka; Rýchloupínanie; Reflexný; Ramenná podložka; Iné
fi: Kitaran hihnan ominaisuudet: Sisäänrakennetut hihnalukot; Joustava osa; Integroitu nippuside; Liukumaton tausta; Yksilöitävä / nimilapun alue; Plektran pidike; Plektra-tasku; Pikavapautus; Heijastava; Olkatoppaus; Muu
zh-CN: 吉他背带特点: 内置背带锁; 弹性/拉伸段; 一体式束线带; 防滑背衬; 个性化/名牌区; 拨片夹; 拨片袋; 快拆; 反光; 肩垫; 其他
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale curelei pentru chitară: Sisteme de blocare a curelei integrate; Secțiune elastică; Legătură de cablu integrată; Suport antiderapant; Zonă personalizată/etichetă de nume; Suport pentru pană; Buzunar pentru pană; Eliberare rapidă; Reflectorizantă; Pernă de umăr; Altele
ja: ギターストラップ機能: ストラップロック内蔵; ゴム/ストレッチセクション; 一体型ケーブルタイ; 滑り止め付きの裏地; パーソナライズ/ネームタグエリア; ピックホルダー; ピックポケット; クイックリリース; 反射材; ショルダーパッド; その他
ru: Характеристики гитарного ремня: Встроенные стреплоки; Эластичная/тянующаяся секция; Встроенная стяжка для кабеля; Нескользящая подкладка; Место для имени/бирка; Держатель для медиаторов; Кармашек для медиаторов; Быстросъемный механизм; Светоотражающий; Наплечник; Другое
sv: Gitarrrem – egenskaper: Inbyggda axelbandslås; Elastisk/stretchande sektion; Integrerad kabelhållare; Glidsäker baksida; Område för personalisering/namnlapp; Plektrumhållare; Plektrumficka; Snabblås; Reflekterande; Axelvadd; Övrigt
da: Guitarremmens funktioner: Indbyggede remlåse; Elastisk/strækbart afsnit; Integreret kabelbinder; Skridsikker bagside; Område til personalisering/navneskilt; Plekterholder; Plekterlomme; Hurtig frigørelse; Reflekterende; Skulderpude; Andet
hr-HR: Značajke remena za gitaru: Ugrađene brave za remen; Elastični/rastezljivi dio; Integrirana vezica za kabel; Protuklizna podloga; Područje za personalizaciju/ime; Držač za trzalice; Džep za trzalice; Brzo otpuštanje; Reflektirajuće; Jastučić za rame; Ostalo
sl-SI: Lastnosti pasu za kitaro: Vgrajeni zaklepi za pas; Elastičen/raztegljiv del; Vgrajena vezica za kable; Nedrseča podlaga; Prilagojeno/območje za imensko oznako; Držalo za trzalice; Žepek za trzalico; Hitro odpenjanje; Odsevno; Naramnica; Drugo
en: Guitar strap features: Built-in strap locks; Elastic/stretch section; Integrated cable tie; Non-slip backing; Personalized/name tag area; Pick holder; Pick pocket; Quick-release; Reflective; Shoulder pad; Other
de: Gitarrengurteigenschaften: Integrierte Strap-Locks; Elastischer/Stretch-Bereich; Integrierter Kabelbinder; Rutschfeste Rückseite; Personalisierbarer/Namensschild-Bereich; Pick-Halter; Pick-Tasche; Schnellverschluss; Reflektierend; Schulterpolster; Sonstige
pl: Cechy paska gitarowego: Wbudowane blokady paska; Elastyczny odcinek; Zintegrowana opaska na kable; Antypoślizgowy spód; Miejsce na imię/personalizację; Uchwyt na kostki; Kieszonka na kostki; Szybkie odpinanie; Odblaskowy; Nakładka na ramię; Inne
bg-BG: Характеристики на колана за китара: Вградени заключващи механизми; Еластична/разтеглива част; Вградена връзка за кабел; Неплъзгаща се подложка; Място за персонализиране/име; Държач за пера; Джоб за пера; Бързо освобождаване; Отразителни елементи; Подложка за рамо; Други
pt-PT: Características da alça para guitarra: Fechos de correia integrados; Secção elástica; Braçadeira de cabos integrada; Verso antiderrapante; Área personalizada/etiqueta de nome; Porta-palhetas; Bolso para palhetas; Desengate rápido; Refletor; Almofada de ombro; Outro
hu: Gitárszíj funkciói: Beépített hevederzár; Rugalmas/sztreccs szakasz; Integrált kábelkötegelő; Csúszásgátló hátlap; Személyre szabott / névtáblás rész; Pengetőtartó; Pengetőzseb; Gyorskioldó; Fényvisszaverő; Vállpárna; Egyéb